Hawaii statutes.
§143-13 Destruction of diseased or unfit
dogs. All dogs taken into the custody of the animal control officer which
by reason of age, disease, or other causes, are unfit for further use or are
dangerous to keep impounded, may be forthwith humanely destroyed by the animal
control officer. [L 1941, c 268, §11; RL 1945, §7162; RL 1955, §156-13; HRS
§143-13; am L 1983, c 227, §10]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next